Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4008
Nomination of conservator or guardian;
relation of agent to court-appointed fiduciary.

(1) In a power of attorney, a principal
may nominate a conservator or guardian of the principal's estate or guardian
of the principal's person for consideration by the court if protective proceedings
for the principal's estate or person are begun after the principal executes
the power of attorney.

(2) If, following execution
of a durable power of attorney, a court of the principal's domicile appoints
a conservator, guardian of the estate, or other fiduciary charged with the
management of all the principal's property or all of his or her property except
specified exclusions, the agent shall be accountable to the fiduciary as well
as to the principal. The fiduciary shall have the same power to revoke or
amend the power of attorney that the principal would have had if he or she
were not disabled or incapacitated.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 8.